California statutes. Penal Code
(m) Each grantee shall report to the board, in a form and at intervals prescribed by the board, their progress in achieving the grant objectives.

(n) The board shall, by no later than 120 days following the close of each grant
 cycle, prepare and submit a report to the Legislature in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code regarding the impact of the violence prevention initiatives supported by CalVIP.

(o) The board shall make evaluations of
 CalVIP-supported initiatives available to the public.

(p) The amendments to this section made by the act that added this subdivision shall apply solely to CalVIP grant applications and awards made after January 1, 2024, and shall not be construed to affect grant applications or awards made prior to this date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 241, Sec. 1.   (AB 762)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 10.5. VIOLENT CRIMES AGAINST WOMEN [14140. - 14143.]

14140.

(a) Each county is authorized and encouraged to create a county task force on violent crimes against women. The board of supervisors of a county which elects to create a task force under this section shall notify the Office of Emergency Services that the county is establishing, by appointment, a countywide task force. Each county task force shall develop a countywide policy on violent crimes against women.

(b) The Office of Emergency Services may provide technical assistance to, and collect and disseminate information on, the county task forces established under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 472.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

14141.

The purpose of each county task force may be as follows:

(a) To promote a countywide policy on violent crimes against women.

(b) To make recommendations on how to reduce violent crime.

(c) To prepare and place counties in a strong position to compete for federal and state funds that may become available for the purposes of this title.

(d) To facilitate coordination of services and responses between governmental agencies and between governmental agencies and nonprofit agencies serving women who are victims of violent crimes.

(e) To initiate local domestic violence prevention planning and priorities for the use of federal and state domestic violence prevention grants.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 995, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

14142.

Each county task force may evaluate and make recommendations regarding the following:

(a) The adequacy of current law enforcement efforts at the local level to reduce the rate of violent crimes against women.

(b) The responsiveness of local prosecutors and the courts to violent crimes against women.

(c) Local government efforts to reduce violent crimes against women.

(d) Public awareness and public dissemination of information essential to the prevention of violent crimes against women.

(e) The information collection and government statistics on the incidence and prevalence of violent crimes against women.

(f) The adequacy of federal, state, and local laws on sexual assault and domestic violence and the need for more uniform statutory responses to sex offenses and domestic violence.

(g) The need for services, including counseling, shelter, legal services, victim advocacy, and other supportive services, for women who are victims of violent crime.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 995, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

14143.

Every effort shall be made to ensure that the ethnic and racial composition of each task force is reflective of the ethnic and racial distribution of the persons and families in the community. Each county task force shall include, to the extent possible, but not be limited to, the following:

(a) A criminal court judge.

(b) A domestic relations or civil court judge.

(c) A prosecuting attorney.

(d) A city council person or other elected local governmental official.

(e) Representatives from the
 Council of Cities, the Police Chief Association, the County Office of Education, the Public Defender Program, the County Bar Association, the Domestic Violence Coalition, health services, social services, probation, a women’s organization, each of the domestic violence shelter-based programs serving the county, each of the rape crisis centers serving the county, a legal services program, a homeless program serving women, other nonprofit community-based organizations whose primary focus is to assist the women who are victims of violent crimes, the Native Tribal Councils, and the county Commission on the Status of Women.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 197, Sec. 35.   (SB 1493)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 10.6. COMMUNITY CONFLICT RESOLUTION PROGRAMS [14150. - 14156.]

14150.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares:

(a) Over the last 10 years, criminal case filings, including misdemeanor filings, have been increasing faster than any other type of filing in California’s courts. Between 1981 and 1991, nontraffic misdemeanor and infraction filings in municipal and justice courts increased by 35 percent.

(b) These misdemeanor cases add to the workload which is now straining the California court system. In addition, many of these cases are ill-suited to complete resolution through the criminal justice system because they involve underlying disputes which may result in continuing conflict and criminal conduct within the community.

(c) Many victims of misdemeanor criminal conduct feel excluded from the criminal justice process. Although they were the direct victims of the offenders’ criminal conduct, the process does not currently provide them with a direct role in holding the offender accountable for this conduct.

(d) Community conflict resolution programs utilizing alternative dispute resolution (ADR) processes such as mediation and arbitration have been effectively used in California and elsewhere to resolve conflicts involving conduct that could be charged as a misdemeanor. These programs can assist in reducing the number of cases burdening the court system. By utilizing ADR processes, these programs also provide an opportunity for direct participation by the victims of the conduct, thereby increasing victims’ satisfaction with the criminal justice process. In addition, by bringing the parties together, these programs may reduce conflict within the community by facilitating the settlement of disputes which are causing repeated misdemeanor criminal conduct and may increase compliance with restitution agreements by encouraging the offender to accept personal responsibility.

(e) As of the effective date of this section, the San Francisco and Contra Costa district attorney offices refer between 1,000 and 1,500 cases per year involving conduct which could be charged as a misdemeanor to California Community Dispute Services, which provides ADR services. Between 70 and 75 percent of these cases are successfully resolved through the ADR process, and the rate of compliance with the agreements reached is between 80 and 93 percent.

(f) The State of New York has developed a substantial statewide alternative dispute resolution program in which 65 percent of the cases using the services are of a criminal nature. These cases are referred to arbitration, conciliation, and mediation. Of the criminal misdemeanor cases that were mediated, 82 percent reached an agreement through the mediation process.

(g) It is in the public interest for community dispute resolution programs to be established to provide ADR services in cases involving conduct which could be charged as a misdemeanor and for district attorneys and courts to be authorized to refer cases to these programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 696, Sec. 91.   Effective September 15, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

14151.

The district attorney may establish a community conflict resolution program pursuant to this title to provide alternative dispute resolution (ADR) services, such as mediation, arbitration, or a combination of both mediation and arbitration (med-arb) in cases, including those brought by a city prosecutor, involving conduct which could be charged as a misdemeanor. The district attorney may contract with a private entity to provide these services and may establish minimum training requirements for the neutral persons conducting the ADR processes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 696, Sec. 91.   Effective September 15, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

14152.

(a) The district attorney may refer cases involving conduct which could be charged as a misdemeanor to the community conflict resolution program. In determining whether to refer a case to the community conflict resolution program, the district attorney shall consider, but is not limited to considering, all of the following:

(1) The nature of the conduct in question.

(2) The nature of the relationship between the alleged victim and the person alleged to have committed the conduct.

(3) Whether referral to the community conflict resolution program is likely to help resolve underlying issues which are likely to result in additional conduct which could be the subject of criminal charges.

(b) No case where there has been a history of child abuse, sexual assault, or domestic violence, as that term is defined in Section 6211 of the Family Code, between the alleged victim and the person alleged to have committed the conduct, or where a protective order, as defined in Section 6218 of the Family Code, is in effect, shall be referred to the community conflict resolution program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 219, Sec. 222.7.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

14153.

Both the alleged victim and the person alleged to have committed the conduct shall knowingly and voluntarily consent to participate in the ADR process conducted by the community conflict resolution program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 696, Sec. 91.   Effective September 15, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

14154.

In a county in which the district attorney has established a community conflict resolution program, the superior court may, with the consent of the district attorney and the defendant, refer misdemeanor cases, including those brought by a city prosecutor, to that program. In determining whether to refer a case to the community conflict resolution program, the court shall consider, but is not limited to considering, all of the following:

(a) The factors listed in Section 14152.

(b) Any other referral criteria established by the district attorney for the program.

The court shall not refer any case to the community conflict resolution program which was previously referred to that program by the district attorney.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 784, Sec. 575.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

14155.

(a) If the alleged victim or the person alleged to have committed the conduct does not agree to participate in the community conflict resolution program or the case is not resolved through the ADR process provided by that program, the community conflict resolution program shall promptly refer the case back to the district attorney or to the court that made the referral for appropriate action.

(b) If the community conflict resolution program determines that a case referred to it prior to the filing of a complaint has been resolved through that referral, the program shall recommend to the district attorney that the case not be prosecuted.

(c) If a case referred to the community conflict resolution program after the filing of a complaint but prior to adjudication is resolved through that referral, the court may dismiss the action pursuant to Section 1378 or 1385.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 696, Sec. 91.   Effective September 15, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

14156.

It is the intent of the Legislature that neither this title nor any other provision of law be construed to preempt other precomplaint or pretrial diversion programs. It is also the intent of the Legislature that this title not preempt other posttrial diversion programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 696, Sec. 91.   Effective September 15, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 11. RECORDS AND REPORTS OF MONETARY INSTRUMENT TRANSACTIONS [14160. - 14167.]

14160.

(a) It is the purpose of this title to require certain reports or records of transactions involving monetary instruments as defined herein where those reports or records have a high degree of usefulness in criminal investigations or proceedings.

(b) The Attorney General shall adopt rules and regulations for the administration and enforcement of this title.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that the rules and regulations prescribed by the Attorney General for the administration and enforcement of this title shall be designed to minimize the cost and difficulty of compliance and shall, to the greatest extent possible, result in report and record-keeping forms consistent with those in use for compliance with Sections 5311 et seq. of Title 31 of the United States Code, Section 6050 I of Title 26 of the United States Code, and regulations adopted thereunder.

(d) Nothing in this title shall be construed to give rise to a private cause of action for relief or damages.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1039, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

14161.

As used in this title:

(a) “Financial institution” means, when located or doing business in this state, any national bank or banking association, state bank or banking association, commercial bank or trust company organized under the laws of the United States or any state, any private bank, industrial savings bank, savings bank or thrift institution, savings and loan association, or building and loan association organized under the laws of the United States or any state, any insured institution as defined in Section 401 of the National Housing Act, any credit union organized under the laws of the United States or any state, any national banking association or corporation acting under Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 601) of Title 12 of the United States Code, any foreign bank, any currency dealer or exchange, any person or business engaged primarily in the cashing of checks, any person or business who regularly engages in the issuing, selling, or redeeming of traveler’s checks, money orders, or similar instruments, any broker or dealer in securities registered or required to be registered with the Securities and Exchange Commission under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, any licensed sender of money, any investment banker or investment company, any insurance company, any dealer in coins, precious metals, stones, or jewelry, any pawnbroker, any telegraph company, any person or business engaged in controlled gambling within the meaning of subdivision (e) of Section 19805 of the Business and Professions Code, whether registered or licensed to do so or not, and any person or business defined as a “bank,” “financial agency,” or “financial institution” by Section 5312 of Title 31 of the United States Code or Section 103.11 of Title 31 of the Code of Federal Regulations and any successor provisions thereto.

(b) “Transaction” includes the deposit, withdrawal, transfer, bailment, loan, payment, or exchange of currency, or a monetary instrument, as defined by subdivision (c), by, through, or to, a financial institution, as defined by subdivision (a). “Transaction” does not include the purchase of gold, silver, or platinum bullion or coins, or diamonds, emeralds, rubies, or sapphires by a bona fide dealer therein, and does not include the sale of gold, silver, or platinum bullion or coins, or diamonds, emeralds, rubies, or sapphires by a bona fide dealer therein in exchange for other than a monetary instrument, and does not include the exchange of gold, silver, or platinum bullion or coins, or diamonds, emeralds, rubies, or sapphires by a bona fide dealer therein for gold, silver, or platinum bullion or coins, or diamonds, emeralds, rubies, or sapphires.

(c) “Monetary instrument” means United States currency and coin; the currency and coin of any foreign country; and any instrument defined as a “monetary instrument” by Section 5312 of Title 31 of the United States Code or Section 103.11 of Title 31 of the Code of Federal Regulations, or the successor of either. Notwithstanding any other provision of this subdivision, “monetary instrument” does not include bank checks, cashier’s checks, traveler’s checks, personal checks, or money orders made payable to the order of a named party that have not been endorsed or that bear restrictive endorsements.

(d) “Department” means the Department of Justice.

(e) “Criminal justice agency” means the Department of Justice and any district attorney’s office, sheriff’s department, police department, or city attorney’s office of this state.

(f) “Currency” means United States currency or coin, the currency or coin of any foreign country, and any legal tender or coin defined as currency by Section 103.11 of Title 31 of the Code of Federal Regulations or any succeeding provision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 867, Sec. 60.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

14162.

(a) A financial institution shall make and keep a record of each transaction by, through, or to, the financial institution that involves currency of more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000). A financial institution shall file a report of the transaction with the department in a form and at the time that the department, by regulation, shall require. The filing with the department within the time specified in its regulations of a duplicate copy of a report of the transaction required by Section 6050I of Title 26 of the United States Code, and any regulations adopted thereunder, shall satisfy the reporting requirements of this subdivision. This subdivision does not apply to a financial institution, as defined in Section 5312 of Title 31 of the United States Code and Section 103.11 of Title 31 of the Code of Federal Regulations and any successor provisions thereto.

(b) A financial institution, as defined in Section 5312 of Title 31 of the United States Code and Section 103.11 of Title 31 of the Code of Federal Regulations and any successor provisions, shall file with the department, at any time as the department by regulation shall require, a duplicate copy of each report required by Sections 5313 and 5314 of Title 31 of the United States Code and by Sections 103.22 and 103.23 of Title 31 of the Code of Federal Regulations, and any successor provisions thereto. The filing pursuant to this subdivision shall satisfy all reporting and recordkeeping requirements of this title.

(c) (1) A financial institution with actual knowledge of the requirements of this section that knowingly and willfully fails to comply with the requirements of this section shall be liable for a civil penalty.

(2) The court may impose a civil penalty for each violation. However, in the first civil proceeding against a financial institution, the civil penalties for all violations shall not exceed a total sum of ten thousand dollars ($10,000). If a civil penalty was imposed in a prior civil proceeding, the civil penalties for all violations shall not exceed a total sum of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000). If a civil penalty was imposed in two or more prior civil proceedings, the civil penalties for all violations shall not exceed a total sum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).

(3) A proceeding for a civil penalty under this subdivision may be brought only by the Attorney General of California or the district attorney for the county in which the violation is alleged to have occurred. The proceeding shall be governed by the Code of Civil Procedure.

(4) This subdivision shall not apply to any case where the financial institution is criminally prosecuted in federal or state court for conduct related to a violation of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 672, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

14163.

Except as otherwise provided, a financial institution may exempt from the reporting requirements of Section 14162 monetary instrument transactions exempted from the reporting requirements of Section 5313 of Title 31 of the United States Code. However, the exemption shall be approved in writing and with the signature of two or more officers of the financial institution and subject to review and disapproval for reasonable cause by the department. An exemption disapproved by the department in writing shall be effective to require reporting pursuant to Section 14162 within five business days of the time the disapproval is communicated to the financial institution. The department may require, by regulation, the maintenance, and may provide for the inspection, of records of exemptions granted under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1039, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

14164.

(a) A financial institution, or any officer, employee, or agent thereof, that keeps and files a record in reliance on Section 14162, shall not be liable to its customer, to a state or local agency, or to any person for any loss or damage caused in whole or in part by the making, filing, or governmental use of the report, or any information contained therein.

(b) This title does not preclude a financial institution, in its discretion, from instituting contact with, and thereafter communicating with and disclosing customer financial records to, appropriate federal, state, or local law enforcement agencies when the financial institution has reason to suspect that the records or information demonstrate that the customer has violated any provision of this title or Section 186.10.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1039, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

14165.

(a) The department shall analyze the reports required by Section 14162 and shall report any possible violations indicated by this analysis to the appropriate criminal justice agency. 

(b) The department, in the discretion of the Attorney General, may make a report or information contained in a report filed under Section 14162 available to a district attorney or a deputy district attorney in this state, upon request made by the district attorney or his or her designee. The report or information shall be available only for a purpose consistent with this title and subject to regulations prescribed by the Attorney General, which shall require the district attorney or his or her designee seeking the report or information contained in the report to specify in writing the specific reasons for believing that a provision of this title or Section 186.10 has been violated. 

(c) The department shall destroy a report filed with it under Section 14162 at the end of the fifth calendar year after receipt of the report, unless the report or information contained in the report is known by the department to be the subject of an existing criminal proceeding or investigation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 578, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

14166.

Any person (a) who willfully violates any provision of this title or any regulation adopted to implement Section 14162, (b) who, knowingly and with the intent either (1) to disguise the fact that a monetary instrument was derived from criminal activity or (2) to promote, manage, establish, carry on, or facilitate the promotion, management, establishment, or carrying on of any criminal activity, furnishes or provides to a financial institution or any officer, employee, or agent thereof or to the department, any false, inaccurate, or incomplete information or conceals a material fact in connection with a transaction for which a report is required to be filed pursuant to either Section 14162 of this code or Section 5313 of Title 31 of the United States Code, or in connection with an exemption prescribed in Section 14163, or (c) who, knowingly and with the intent either (1) to disguise the fact that a monetary instrument was derived from criminal activity or (2) to promote, manage, establish, carry on, or facilitate the promotion, management, establishment, or carrying on of any criminal activity, conducts a monetary instrument transaction or series of transactions by or through one or more financial institutions as part of a scheme and with the intent to avoid the making or filing of a report required under either Section 14162 of this code or Section 5313 of Title 31 of the United States Code, shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one year or in the state prison, by a fine of not more than the greater of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) or twice the monetary value of the financial transaction or transactions, or by both that imprisonment and fine.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any violation of this section as to each monetary instrument transaction or exemption constitutes a separate, punishable offense.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1187, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

14167.

Any report, record, information, analysis, or request obtained by the department or any agency pursuant to this title is not a public record as defined in Section 7920.530 of the Government Code and is not subject to disclosure under Article 1 (commencing with Section 7922.500) and Article 2 (commencing with Section 7922.525) of Chapter 1 of Part 3 of Division 10 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 352.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 11.5. CENTRAL VALLEY RURAL CRIME PREVENTION PROGRAM [14170. - 14174.]

14170.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this measure to enhance crime prevention efforts by establishing a pilot program to strengthen the ability of law enforcement agencies in rural areas to detect and monitor agricultural- and rural-based crimes.

(b) The County of Tulare has developed the Rural Crime Demonstration Project administered by the Tulare County District Attorney’s office under a joint powers agreement
 with the Tulare County Sheriff’s office entered into pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

The parties to that agreement formed a task force to include the office of the Tulare County Agricultural Commissioner. The task force is an interactive team working together to develop problem solving and crime control techniques, to encourage timely reporting of crimes, and to evaluate the results of these activities. The task force conducts joint operations in order to facilitate investigative coordination. The task force consults with experts from the United States military, the California Military Department, the Department of Justice, other law enforcement entities, and various other state and private organizations as deemed necessary to maximize the effectiveness of the task force. Media and community support have been solicited to promote the task force.

The Rural
 Crime Demonstration Project has proven its cost effectiveness. It is appropriate that the project be expanded into a program that will allow the County of Tulare to continue to operate the task force formed under the above described joint powers agreement, and to permit the Counties of Fresno, Kern, Kings, Madera, Merced, San Joaquin, and Stanislaus to establish their own programs, pursuant to the provisions of this title, and to collectively establish a task force for the prevention of rural crime in those counties.

(c) The Legislature finds and declares that California has experienced an escalation in agricultural crimes in general, both property and personal, and that there has been no concentrated effort applied to the prevention of crimes against the agricultural industry. Currently, no national or state agency keeps track of statistics on agricultural and rural crime. According to media reports, this state lost millions of dollars worth
 of crops, livestock, and equipment in 1994 and 1995. A majority of these crimes occurred in agricultural-based counties. However, there has been no effort on the part of any state or local agency to accurately record these types of crimes.

The Legislature further finds and declares that there are no state or local law enforcement agencies in this state with programs that are specially designed to detect or monitor agricultural- and rural-based criminal activities. In addition, local law enforcement agencies do not possess the jurisdictional authority, investigative facilities, or data systems to coordinate a comprehensive approach to the state’s agricultural and rural crime problem.

The Legislature additionally finds and declares that the proliferation of agricultural and rural crime in the various rural counties of this state is a threat to the vitality of our rich agrarian tradition. Agricultural and rural crime, if left
 unchecked, endangers an entire industry that is vital to America’s continued economic role in the world, and therefore requires a proactive response from the Legislature. The intent of the Legislature in authorizing the Central Valley Rural Crime Prevention Program pursuant to this act is to provide for the protection and safety of the state’s agriculture industry by creating statewide standards and methods of detecting and tracking agrarian and rural crime.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 719, Sec. 2.   Effective September 20, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

14171.

(a) Each of the Counties of Fresno, Kern, Kings, Madera, Merced, San Joaquin, Stanislaus, and Tulare may develop within its respective jurisdiction a Central Valley Rural Crime Prevention Program, which shall be administered by the county district attorney’s office or the county sheriff’s department of each respective county under a joint powers agreement entered into pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(b) The parties to each agreement shall form a regional task force that shall be known as the Central Valley Rural Crime Task Force, that may include the respective county office of the county agricultural commissioner,
 the county district attorney, the county sheriff, and interested property owner groups or associations. The task force shall be an interactive team working together to develop crime prevention, problem solving, and crime control techniques, to encourage timely reporting of crimes, and to evaluate the results of these activities. The task force may operate from a joint facility in order to facilitate investigative coordination. The task force may also consult with experts from the United States military, the California Military Department, the Department of Justice, other law enforcement entities, and various other state and private organizations as deemed necessary to maximize the effectiveness of this program. Media and community support may be solicited to promote this program. Each of the participating designated counties shall adopt rules and regulations for the implementation and administration of this program.

(1) In order to receive
 funds for this program, each designated county shall agree to participate in a regional task force, to be known as the Central Valley Rural Crime Task Force, and shall appoint a representative to that task force.

(2) The Central Valley Rural Crime Task Force may develop rural crime prevention programs containing a system for reporting rural crimes that enables the swift recovery of stolen goods and the apprehension of criminal suspects for prosecution. The task force may develop computer software and use communication technology to implement the reporting system, although the task force is not limited to the use of these means to achieve the stated goals.

(3) The Central Valley Rural Crime Task Force may develop a uniform procedure for all participating counties to collect, and each participating county may collect, data on agricultural crimes. The task force may also establish a
 central database for the collection and maintenance of data on agricultural crimes and designate one participating county to maintain the database. State funds the counties receive to operate their rural crime prevention programs may be used to implement the requirements of this paragraph. This paragraph does not prohibit counties from using their own funds to implement the paragraph’s provisions, however, it is the Legislature’s intent that this paragraph shall not be construed as creating a state-mandated local program.

(c) The staff for each program may consist of the personnel designated by the district attorney and sheriff for each county in accordance with the joint powers agreement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 43, Sec. 79.   (SB 1023)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

14173.

Funds appropriated to the Central Valley Rural Crime Prevention Program shall be allocated by the Controller and distributed according to the following schedule:Fresno County 23%Kern County 17%Kings County 8.5%Madera County 5.5%Merced County 8.5%San Joaquin County 8.5%Stanislaus County 8.5%Tulare County 20.5%

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 43, Sec. 80.   (SB 1023)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

14174.

Funds appropriated for the purposes of this title shall be allocated based on the counties’ compliance with paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 14171.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 14174.3 by Stats. 2005, Ch. 497, Sec. 6.   Effective October 4, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 11.7. CENTRAL COAST RURAL CRIME PREVENTION PROGRAM [14180. - 14182.]

14180.

The Legislature encourages the Counties of Monterey, San Benito, Santa Barbara, Santa Cruz, and San Luis Obispo to develop, adopt, and implement a Central Coast Rural Crime Prevention Program based upon the Central Valley Rural Crime Prevention Program established by Title 11.5 (commencing with Section 14170) of Part 4.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 18, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

14181.

(a) The Counties of Monterey, San Luis Obispo, Santa Barbara, Santa Cruz, and San Benito may each develop within its respective jurisdiction a Central Coast Rural Crime Prevention Program, which shall be administered in San Benito County, Santa Barbara County, Santa Cruz County, and San Luis Obispo County by the county district attorney’s office or the county sheriff’s office under a joint powers agreement entered into pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(b) The parties to each agreement shall form a regional task force that shall be known as the Central Coast Rural Crime Task Force, that includes the respective county
 office of the county agricultural commissioner, the county district attorney, the county sheriff, and interested property owner groups or associations. The task force shall be an interactive team working together to develop crime prevention, problem solving, and crime control techniques, to encourage timely reporting of crimes, and to evaluate the results of these activities. The task force may operate from a joint facility in order to facilitate investigative coordination. The task force may also consult with experts from the United States military, other law enforcement entities, and various private organizations as deemed necessary to maximize the effectiveness of this program. Media and community support may be solicited to promote this program. Each of the participating designated counties shall adopt rules and regulations for the implementation and administration of this program.

(1) The Central Coast Rural Crime Task Force may develop
 rural crime prevention programs containing a system for reporting rural crimes that enables the swift recovery of stolen goods and the apprehension of criminal suspects for prosecution. The task force may develop computer software and use communication technology to implement the reporting system, although the task force is not limited to the use of these means to achieve the stated goals.

(2) The Central Coast Rural Crime Task Force may develop a uniform procedure for all participating counties to collect, and each participating county may collect, data on agricultural crimes. The task force may also establish a central database for the collection and maintenance of data on agricultural crimes and designate one participating county to maintain the database.

(c) The staff for each program shall consist of the personnel designated by the district attorney and sheriff for each
 county in accordance with the joint powers agreement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 43, Sec. 82.   (SB 1023)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

14182.

Sources of funding for the program may include, but shall not be limited to, appropriations from local government and private contributions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 18, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 12. VIOLENT CRIME INFORMATION CENTER [14200. - 14216.]

14200.

(a) The Attorney General shall establish and maintain the Violent Crime Information Center to assist in the identification and the apprehension of persons responsible for specific violent crimes and for the disappearance and exploitation of persons, particularly children and at-risk adults.

(b) The center shall establish and maintain programs which include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Developing violent offender profiles.

(2) Assisting local law enforcement agencies and county district attorneys by providing
 investigative information on persons responsible for specific violent crimes and missing person cases.

(3) Providing physical description information and photographs, if available, of missing persons to county district attorneys, nonprofit missing persons organizations, and schools.

(4) Providing statistics on missing at-risk adults and on missing children, including, as may be applicable, family abductions, nonfamily abductions, voluntary missing, and lost children or lost at-risk adults.

(c) The Attorney General shall provide training on the services provided by the center to line personnel, supervisors, and investigators in the following fields: law enforcement, district attorneys’ offices, the Department of Corrections
 and Rehabilitation, probation departments, court mediation services, and the judiciary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 437, Sec. 9.   (SB 1066)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

14201.
